New Jersey, session 221, A5770.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.  a.  Notwithstanding the provisions of any law, rule, or regulation to the contrary, in the case of a school district that experienced a net decrease in its State school aid allocation between the 2017-2018 school year and the 2024-2025 school year, the Commissioner of Education shall not apply any State aid growth limit to increases in State school aid whereby a school districts uncapped State school aid for the 2025-2026 school year, as calculated for the district pursuant to the State school aid notice distributed to the district in February 2025, is reduced. b.  As used in this section, State school aid allocation means the amount of equalization aid, special education categorical aid, security categorical aid, transportation aid, adjustment aid, and vocational expansion stabilization aid received by a school district in any given year; and Uncapped State school aid means the amount of equalization aid, special education categorical aid, security categorical aid, and transportation aid as calculated for a school district prior to the application of any State aid growth limit. 2.  This act shall take effect immediately and apply to State school aid provided in the 2025-2026 school year.